Maine, session 132, LD1282.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 27 MRSA §505, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 9, §1, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) The historic property that is the subject of the grant application must be listed
on the National Register of Historic Places as authorized by the National Historic
Preservation Act of 1966 or, have been nominated to the register by the
commission or have been designated as a historic property by a municipal historic
preservation ordinance.
Sec. 2. Eligibility for historic preservation bond proceeds. No later than
November 30, 2025, the Maine Historic Preservation Commission shall adopt rules
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 27, section 504, subsection 2-A regarding the
disbursement of bond proceeds authorized by Public Law 2023, chapter 653 to establish a
process for properties in the State that are not on the National Register of Historic Places
but have been designated as historic properties by municipal historic preservation
ordinances to receive funding through the bond proceeds.